Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 6. Business and Commercial Offenses.

Collateral references. —

12 Am. Jur. 2d, Bribery, § 1 et seq.

37 Am. Jur. 2d, Fraud and Deceit, § 1 et seq.

11 C.J.S., Bribery, § 1 et seq.

37 C.J.S., Fraud, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 11.46.600.
Scheme to defraud.

A person commits the crime of scheme to defraud if the person engages in conduct constituting a scheme

to defraud five or more persons or to obtain property or services from five or more persons by false or fraudulent pretense, representation, or promise and obtains property or services in accordance with the scheme; or

to defraud one or more persons of $10,000 or to obtain $10,000 or more from one or more persons by false or fraudulent pretense, representation, or promise and obtains property or services in accordance with the scheme.

Scheme to defraud is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 14 ch 102 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

Definition of “property,” “services” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “obtain” — AS

11.46.990

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: IV, 30-34.

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 29, 1980.

Sec. 11.46.620.
Misapplication of property.

A person commits the crime of misapplication of property if the person knowingly misapplies property that has been entrusted to that person as a fiduciary or that is property of the government or a financial institution.

It is not a defense to a prosecution under this section that it may be impossible to identify particular property as belonging to the victim at the time of the defendant’s misapplication.

For purposes of this section, “misapply” means to deal with or dispose of property contrary to

law;

a judicial rule or order; or

the obligations of a fiduciary relationship.

Misapplication of property is

a class C felony if the value of the property misapplied is $750 or more;

a class A misdemeanor if the value of the property misapplied is less than $750.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 15 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 18 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 22 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 15 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 31 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “fiduciary,” “government,” “law” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “financial institution” — AS

11.46.990

(3)

Theft by failure to make required disposition of funds received or held — AS

11.46.210

Original Code Provision — AS 11.20.330; AS 11.20.290; AS 11.20.340; AS 11.20.300.

TD: IV, 34-36.

For punishment of imprisonment for class B and C felonies, see
AS

12.55.125(e)

and (i).

For imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

, and
AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (d), see sec. 185(a)(17), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (d), see sec. 75(a)(14), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (d)(1) and (2), inserted “adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” after “misapplied” and substituted “$1,000” for “$750”.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (d)(1) and (2), substituted “$750” for “$1,000”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “property misapplied” in (d)(1) and (d)(2).

Editor's notes. —

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (d) as amended by sec. 18, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (d) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 29, 1980.

Sec. 11.46.630.
Falsifying business records.

A person commits the crime of falsifying business records if, with intent to defraud, the person

makes or causes a false entry in the business records of an enterprise;

alters, erases, obliterates, deletes, removes, or destroys a true entry in the business records of an enterprise;

omits to make a true entry in the business records of an enterprise in violation of a duty to do so which the person knows to be imposed upon that person by law or by the nature of that person’s position; or

prevents the making of a true entry or causes the omission of a true entry in the business records of an enterprise.

For purposes of this section,

“business record” means a writing, recording, or article kept or maintained by an enterprise for the purpose of evidencing or reflecting its condition or activity;

“enterprise” means a private entity of one or more persons, corporate or otherwise, engaged in business, commercial, professional, charitable, political, industrial, or social activity.

Falsifying business records is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 8 ch 65 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

Definition of “law” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intent to defraud” — AS

11.46.990

(11)

Theft by deception — AS

11.46.180

Forgery in the first, second, and third degree — AS

11.46.500

—

11.46.510

Scheme to defraud — AS

11.46.600

Original Code Provision — AS 11.20.430

TD: IV, 36-37

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Opinions of attorney general. —

When an official of a land title company seeking to file a warranty deed in Alaska, in the presence of the recorder altered a California notary clause to change the name and title of the person that the California notary public swore had appeared before her, the alteration may well have violated this section.
December 22, 1987, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 11.46.660.
Commercial bribe receiving.

A person commits the crime of commercial bribe receiving if the person solicits, accepts, or agrees to accept a benefit with intent to violate a duty to which that person is subject as

an agent or employee of another;

a trustee, guardian, or other fiduciary;

a lawyer, physician, accountant, appraiser, or other professional adviser;

an officer, director, partner, manager, or other participant in the direction of the affairs of an organization; or

an arbitrator or other purportedly disinterested adjudicator or referee.

Commercial bribe receiving is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.46.670.
Commercial bribery.

A person commits the crime of commercial bribery if, knowing that another is subject to a duty described in AS

11.46.660(a)

and with intent to influence the other to violate that duty, the person confers, offers to confer, or agrees to confer a benefit on the other.

Commercial bribery is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “fiduciary,” “benefit,” “organization” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Bribery and bribe receiving — AS

11.56.100

,

11.56.110

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: IV, 38-39.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Collateral references. —

Entrapment to commit bribery or offer to bribe, 69 ALR2d 1397.

Validity and construction of statutes punishing commercial bribery,
58 ALR Fed. 797.

Sec. 11.46.710.
Deceptive business practices.

A person commits the crime of deceptive business practices if, in the course of engaging in a business, occupation, or profession, the person

makes a false statement in an advertisement or communication addressed to the public or to a substantial number of persons in connection with the promotion of the sale of property or services or to increase the consumption of property or services;

uses or possesses for use a false weight or measure or any other device for falsely determining or recording any quality or quantity;

sells, offers for sale, exposes for sale, or delivers less than the represented quantity of a commodity or service;

sells, offers for sale, or exposes for sale adulterated commodities; or

sells, offers for sale, or exposes for sale mislabeled commodities.

As used in this section,

“adulterated” means varying from the standard of composition or quality prescribed by law or, if none, as set by established commercial usage;

“false statement” means an offer to sell or provide property or services made with intent not to sell or provide the advertised property or services

at the price or of the quality advertised;

in a quantity sufficient to meet the reasonably expected public demand unless quantity is specifically stated in the advertisement; or

at all;

“mislabeled” means

varying from the standard of truth or disclosure in labeling prescribed by law or, if none, as set by established commercial usage; or

represented as being another person’s product, though otherwise labeled accurately as to quality and quantity.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, deceptive business practices is a class A misdemeanor.

Deceptive business practices is a class C felony if the person uses the Internet or a computer network to commit the offense. In this subsection, “Internet” means the combination of computer systems or networks that make up the international network for interactive communications services, including remote logins, file transfer, electronic mail, and newsgroups.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am §§ 9, 10 ch 65 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

Definition of “property,” “services,” “possess” — AS 11.46.900(b)

Theft by deception — AS

11.46.180

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: V, 39-42.

For punishment of imprisonment for class B and C felonies, see
AS

12.55.125(e)

and (i).

For imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

, and
AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.46.720.
Misrepresentation of use of a propelled vehicle.

A person commits the crime of misrepresentation of use of a propelled vehicle if, with intent to deceive any person, the person sells, leases, or offers or exposes for sale or lease a propelled vehicle knowing that a usage registering device on the vehicle has been disconnected, adjusted, or replaced so as to misrepresent the distance traveled by the vehicle or the hours of engine use.

As used in this section, “usage registering device” means any odometer, speedometer, recording tachometer, hobbsmeter, or other instrument that registers the distance traveled by the vehicle or the hours of engine use.

Misrepresentation of use of a propelled vehicle is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Civil Penalties — AS

45.50.471(b)(18)

Definition of “propelled vehicle,” “deception” — AS 11.81.90

Definition of “intentionally,” “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Theft by deception — AS

11.46.180

Unlawful acts and practices — AS

45.50.471(b)(18)

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: V, 42-43.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.46.730.
Defrauding creditors.

A person commits the crime of defrauding creditors if

knowing that property is subject to a security interest, the person

with intent to defraud, fails to disclose that security interest to a buyer of that property; or

destroys, removes, conceals, encumbers, transfers, or otherwise deals with that property with intent to hinder enforcement of that security interest;

the person destroys, removes, conceals, encumbers, transfers, or otherwise deals with the person’s property with intent to defraud an existing judgment creditor; or

knowing that proceedings have been or are about to be instituted for the appointment of an administrator or that a composition agreement or other arrangement for the benefit of creditors has been made or is about to be made, the person, with intent to defraud any creditor,

destroys, removes, conceals, encumbers, transfers, or otherwise disposes of any part of or interest in the debtor’s estate;

obtains a substantial part of or interest in the debtor’s estate;

presents to any creditor or to the administrator a writing or record relating to the debtor’s estate knowing that it contains a false statement; or

misrepresents or fails to disclose to the administrator the existence, amount, or location of any part of or interest in the debtor’s estate or any information which that person is legally required to furnish to the administrator.

As used in this section, “administrator” means an assignee or trustee for the benefit of creditors, a liquidator, a receiver, or any other person entitled to administer property for the benefit of creditors.

Defrauding creditors is a class A misdemeanor unless that secured party, judgment creditor, or creditor incurs a pecuniary loss of $750 or more as a result of the defendant’s conduct, in which case defrauding secured creditors is

a class B felony if the loss is $25,000 or more;

a class C felony if the loss is $750 or more but less than $25,000.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 19 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 23 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 3 ch 13 SLA 2017; am § 16 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 32 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intent to defraud,” “property of another” — AS

11.46.990

Definition of “property” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Original Code Provision — AS 11.20.400.

TD: V, 43-46.

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment for class B felonies, AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment for class C felonies, AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (c), see sec. 185(a)(18), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the first 2017 amendment to subsection (c), see sec. 29, ch. 13, SLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the second 2017 amendment to subsection (c), see sec. 75(a)(15), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in the introductory language of (c) and in (c)(2), inserted “adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” following “loss”, substituted “$1,000” for “$750” and made a minor change; in (c)(1), inserted “adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” following “loss”.

The first 2017 amendment (ch 13), effective June 20, 2017, in (c)(1), deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “if the loss”.

The second 2017 amendment (ch 1 4SSLA), effective November 27, 2017, in the introductory language in (c), and in (c)(2), substituted “$750” for “$1,000”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (c), deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “pecuniary loss” in the introductory paragraph and following “if the loss” in (c)(2).

Editor's notes. —

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (c) as amended by sec. 19, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (c) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.46.740.
Criminal use of computer.

A person commits the offense of criminal use of a computer if, having no right to do so or any reasonable ground to believe the person has such a right, the person knowingly

accesses, causes to be accessed, or exceeds the person’s authorized access to a computer, computer system, computer program, computer network, or any part of a computer system or network, and, as a result of or in the course of that access,

obtains information concerning a person;

introduces false information into a computer, computer system, computer program, or computer network with the intent to damage or enhance the data record or the financial reputation of a person;

introduces false information into a computer, computer system, computer program, or computer network and, with criminal negligence, damages or enhances the data record or the financial reputation of a person;

obtains proprietary information of another person;

obtains information that is only available to the public for a fee;

introduces instructions, a computer program, or other information that tampers with, disrupts, disables, or destroys a computer, computer system, computer program, computer network, or any part of a computer system or network; or

encrypts or decrypts data;

installs, enables, or uses a keystroke logger or other device or program that has the ability to record another person’s keystrokes or entries on a computer; or

uses a keystroke logger or other device or program to intercept or record another person’s keystrokes or entries on a computer when those entries are transmitted wirelessly or by other non-wired means.

In this section, “proprietary information” means scientific, technical, or commercial information, including a design, process, procedure, customer list, supplier list, or customer records that the holder of the information has not made available to the public.

Criminal use of a computer is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 79 SLA 1984; am §§ 11, 12 ch 65 SLA 2000; am § 9 ch 20 SLA 2011)

Cross references. —

Theft of services — AS

11.46.200

Criminal mischief in the third degree — AS

11.46.484

Definition of “access,” “computer,” “computer network,” “computer program,” “computer system,” “data,” “obtains” — AS

11.46.990

Definition of “knowing,” “intent” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Original Code Provision — None.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was enacted as (c).
Relettered in 2000, at which time former subsection (b) was relettered as (c).